Utah statutes.
78B-10-107.   Prohibited mediator reports.

(1)  Except as required in Subsection (2), a mediator may not make a report, assessment, evaluation, recommendation, finding, or other communication regarding a mediation to a court, administrative agency, or other authority that may make a ruling on the dispute that is the subject of the mediation.

(2)  A mediator may disclose:

(a)  whether the mediation occurred or has terminated, whether a settlement was reached, and attendance;

(b)  a mediation communication as permitted under Section 78B-10-106; or

(c)  a mediation communication evidencing abuse, neglect, abandonment, or exploitation of an individual to a public agency responsible for protecting individuals against such mistreatment.

(3)  A communication made in violation of Subsection (1) may not be considered by a court, administrative agency, or arbitrator.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

